Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$107,812,436 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from lottery moneys
deposited into the Watershed Conservation Grant  Fund from the Parks and Natural Re-
sources Fund, for local grant expenditure  purposes listed in Article XV, section 4b, of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-INTRO) Page 1